Oklahoma, session 2025, SB798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-104, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 445, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 3-104), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3-104. A. The supervision of the public school system


of Oklahoma shall be vested in the State Board of Education and,


subject to limitations otherwise provided by law, the State Board of


Education shall:

Req. No. 1370 Page 1


1. Adopt policies and make rules for the operation of the


public school system of the state;


2. Appoint, prescribe the duties, and fix the compensation of a


secretary, an attorney, and all other personnel necessary for the


proper performance of the functions of the State Board of Education.


The secretary shall not be a member of the Board;


3. Submit to the Governor a departmental budget based upon


major functions of the State Department of Education as prepared by


the Superintendent of Public Instruction and supported by detailed


data on needs and proposed operations as partially determined by the


budgetary needs of local school districts filed with the State Board


of Education for the ensuing fiscal year. Appropriations therefor


shall be made in lump-sum form for each major item in the budget as


follows:


a. State Aid to schools,


b. the supervision of all other functions of general and


special education including general control, free


textbooks, school lunch, Indian education, and all


other functions of the Board and an amount sufficient


to adequately staff and administer these services, and


c. the Board shall determine the details by which the


budget and the appropriations are administered.


Annually, the Board shall make preparations to


consolidate all of the functions of the Department in

Req. No. 1370 Page 2


such a way that the budget can be based on two items,


administration and aid to schools. A maximum amount


for administration shall be designated as a part of


the total appropriation;


4. On the first day of December preceding each regular session


of the Legislature, prepare and deliver electronically to the


Governor and the Legislature a report for the year ending June 30


immediately preceding the regular session of the Legislature. The


report shall contain:


a. detailed statistics and other information concerning


enrollment, attendance, expenditures including State


Aid, and other pertinent data for all public schools


in this state,


b. reports from each and every division within the State


Department of Education as submitted by the


Superintendent of Public Instruction and any other


division, department, institution, or other agency


under the supervision of the Board,


c. recommendations for the improvement of the public


school system of the state,


d. a statement of the receipts and expenditures of the


State Board of Education for the past year, and


e. a statement of plans and recommendations for the


management and improvement of public schools and such

Req. No. 1370 Page 3


other information relating to the educational


interests of the state as may be deemed necessary and


desirable;


5. Provide for the formulation and adoption of curricula,


courses of study, and other instructional aids necessary for the


adequate instruction of pupils in the public schools;


6. Have authority in matters pertaining to the licensure and


certification of persons for instructional, supervisory, and


administrative positions and services in the public schools of the


state subject to the provisions of Section 6-184 of this title, and


shall formulate rules governing the issuance and revocation of


certificates for superintendents of schools, principals,


supervisors, librarians, clerical employees, school nurses, school


bus drivers, visiting teachers, classroom teachers, and for other


personnel performing instructional, administrative, and supervisory


services, but not including members of boards of education and other


employees who do not work directly with pupils, and may charge and


collect reasonable fees for the issuance of such certificates:


a. the State Department of Education shall not issue a


certificate to and shall revoke the certificate of any


person who has been convicted, whether upon a verdict


or plea of guilty or upon a plea of nolo contendere,


or received a suspended sentence or any probationary


term for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime

Req. No. 1370 Page 4


provided for in Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes if the offense involved sexual abuse


or sexual exploitation as those terms are defined in


Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


Section 741, 843.1, if the offense included sexual


abuse or sexual exploitation, 865 et seq., 885, 888,


891, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1040.13a, 1087, 1088,


1111.1, 1114, or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes or who enters this state and who has been


convicted, received a suspended sentence, or received


a deferred judgment for a crime or attempted crime


which, if committed or attempted in this state, would


be a crime or an attempt to commit a crime provided


for in any of the laws, and


b. except as provided for in subparagraph a of this


paragraph, the State Board of Education shall have the


authority to revoke or suspend a certificate only for


the following reasons:


(1) a willful violation of any federal or state law,


(2) the abuse or neglect of a child,


(3) moral turpitude,


(4) incompetency in the performance of duty, or


(5) neglect of any professional duty.



Req. No. 1370 Page 5


The State Board of Education shall not have the


authority to summarily revoke or suspend a certificate


pending an individual proceeding for revocation or


other action unless for a valid emergency as defined


in the Administrative Procedures Act. In no event


shall the State Board of Education move to revoke or


suspend a certificate, emergency or otherwise, unless


the certificate holder and any employing school


district has received notice at least ten (10) days


prior to filing of the complaint, and


c. all funds collected by the State Department of


Education for the issuance of certificates to


instructional, supervisory, and administrative


personnel in the public schools of the state shall be


deposited in the “Teachers’ Certification Fund” in the


State Treasury and may be expended by the State Board


of Education to finance the activities of the State


Department of Education necessary to administer the


program, for consultative services, publication costs,


actual and necessary travel expenses as provided in


the State Travel Reimbursement Act incurred by persons


performing research work, and other expenses found


necessary by the State Board of Education for the


improvement of the preparation and certification of

Req. No. 1370 Page 6


teachers in this state. Provided, any unobligated


balance in the Teachers’ Certification Fund in excess


of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) on June 30 of any


fiscal year shall be transferred to the General


Revenue Fund of this state. Until July 1, 1997, the


State Board of Education shall have authority for


approval of teacher education programs. The State


Board of Education shall also have authority for the


administration of teacher residency and professional


development, subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Teacher Preparation Act;


7. Promulgate rules governing the classification, inspection,


supervision, and accrediting of all public nursery, kindergarten,


elementary and secondary schools, and on-site educational services


provided by public school districts or state-accredited private


schools in partial hospitalization programs, day treatment programs,


and day hospital programs as defined in this section, Section 3-


104.7 of this title, and Section 603.4 175.20 of Title 10 of the


Oklahoma Statutes for persons between the ages of three (3) and


twenty-one (21) years of age in the state. However, no school shall


be denied accreditation solely on the basis of average daily


attendance.


Any school district which maintains an elementary school and


faces the necessity of relocating its school facilities because of

Req. No. 1370 Page 7


construction of a lake, either by state or federal authority, which


will inundate the school facilities, shall be entitled to receive


probationary accreditation from the State Board of Education for a


period of five (5) years after June 12, 1975, and any school


district, otherwise qualified, shall be entitled to receive


probationary accreditation from the State Board of Education for a


period of two (2) consecutive years to attain the minimum average


daily attendance. The Head Start and public nurseries or


kindergartens operated from community action agency funds shall not


be subjected to the accrediting rules of the State Board of


Education. Neither will the State Board of Education make rules


affecting the operation of the public nurseries and kindergartens


operated from federal funds secured through community action


agencies even though they may be operating in the public schools of


the state. However, any of the Head Start or public nurseries or


kindergartens operated under federal regulations may make


application for accrediting from the State Board of Education but


will be accredited only if application for the approval of the


programs is made. The status of no school district shall be changed


which will reduce it to a lower classification until due notice has


been given to the proper authorities thereof and an opportunity


given to correct the conditions which otherwise would be the cause


of such reduction.



Req. No. 1370 Page 8


Private and parochial schools may be accredited and classified


in like manner as public schools or, if an accrediting association


is approved by the State Board of Education, by procedures


established by the State Board of Education to accept accreditation


by such accrediting association, if application is made to the State


Board of Education for such accrediting;


8. Be the legal agent of this state to accept, in its


discretion, the provisions of any Act of Congress appropriating or


apportioning funds which are now, or may hereafter be, provided for


use in connection with any phase of the system of public education


in Oklahoma. It shall prescribe such rules as it finds necessary to


provide for the proper distribution of such funds in accordance with


the state and federal laws;


9. Be and is specifically hereby designated as the agency of


this state to cooperate and deal with any officer, board, or


authority of the United States Government under any law of the


United States which may require or recommend cooperation with any


state board having charge of the administration of public schools


unless otherwise provided by law;


10. Be and is hereby designated as the “State Educational


Agency” state educational agency referred to in Public Law 396 of


the 79th Congress of the United States, as amended, which law states


that the act may be cited known as the “National Richard B. Russell


National School Lunch Act” Act, and the State Board of Education is

Req. No. 1370 Page 9


hereby authorized and directed to accept the terms and provisions of


the act and to enter into such agreements, not in conflict with the


Constitution of Oklahoma or the Constitution and Statutes of the


United States, as may be necessary or appropriate to secure for this


state the benefits of the school lunch program established and


referred to in the act;


11. Have authority to secure and administer the benefits of the


Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, Public Law 396 of the


79th Congress of the United States, as amended, in this state and is


hereby authorized to employ or appoint and fix the compensation of


such additional officers or employees and to incur such expenses as


may be necessary for the accomplishment of the above purpose, and


administer the distribution of any state funds appropriated by the


Legislature required as federal matching to reimburse on children’s


meals;


12. Accept and provide for the administration of any land,


money, buildings, gifts, donation donations, or other things of


value which may be offered or bequeathed to the schools under the


supervision or control of the Board;


13. Have authority to require persons having administrative


control of all school districts in Oklahoma to make such regular and


special reports regarding the activities of the schools in the


districts as the Board may deem needful for the proper exercise of


its duties and functions. Such authority shall include the right of

Req. No. 1370 Page 10


the State Board of Education to withhold all state funds under its


control, to withhold official recognition including accrediting,


until such required reports have been filed and accepted in the


office of the Board and to revoke the certificates of persons


failing or refusing to make such reports;


14. Have general supervision of the school lunch program. The


State Board of Education may sponsor workshops for personnel and


participants in the school lunch program and may develop, print, and


distribute free of charge or sell any materials, books, and


bulletins to be used in the school lunch programs. There is hereby


created in the State Treasury a revolving fund for the Board, to be


designated the “School Lunch Workshop Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall consist of all fees derived from or on behalf of any


participant in any such workshop sponsored by the State Board of


Education, or from the sale of any materials, books, and bulletins,


and funds shall be disbursed for expenses of such workshops and for


developing, printing, and distributing of the materials, books, and


bulletins relating to the school lunch program. The fund shall be


administered in accordance with Section 155 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


15. Prescribe all forms for school district and county officers


to report to the State Board of Education where required. The State


Board of Education shall also prescribe a list of appropriation


accounts by which the funds of school districts shall be budgeted,

Req. No. 1370 Page 11


accounted for, and expended; and it shall be the duty of the State


Auditor and Inspector in prescribing all budgeting, accounting, and


reporting forms for school funds to conform to such lists;


16. Provide for the establishment of a uniform system of pupil


and personnel accounting, records, and reports;


17. Have authority to provide for the health and safety of


school children and school personnel while under the jurisdiction of


school authorities;


18. Provide for the supervision of the transportation of


pupils;


19. Have authority, upon request of the local school board, to


act in behalf of the public schools of the state in the purchase of


transportation equipment;


20. Have authority and is hereby required to perform all duties


necessary to the administration of the public school system in


Oklahoma as specified in the Oklahoma School Code; and, in addition


thereto, those duties not specifically mentioned herein if not


delegated by law to any other agency or official;


21. Administer the State Public Common School Building


Equalization Fund established by Section 32 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution. Any monies as may be appropriated or


designated by the Legislature, other than ad valorem taxes, any


other funds identified by the State Department of Education, which


may include, but not be limited to, grants-in-aid from the federal

Req. No. 1370 Page 12


government for building purposes, the proceeds of all property that


shall fall to the state by escheat, penalties for unlawful holding


of real estate by corporations, and capital gains on assets of the


permanent school funds, shall be deposited in the State Public


Common School Building Equalization Fund. The fund shall be used to


aid school districts and charter schools in acquiring buildings,


subject to the limitations fixed by Section 32 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution. It is hereby declared that redbud school


grants disbursed from the State Public Common School Building


Equalization Fund shall be used for the same purposes as a building


fund, as provided for in Section 1-118 of this title. It is hereby


declared that the term “school districts” as used in Section 32 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution shall mean school districts


and eligible charter schools as defined in subsection B of this


section. The State Board of Education shall disburse redbud school


grants annually from the State Public Common School Building


Equalization Fund to public schools and eligible charter schools


pursuant to subsection B of this section. The Board shall


promulgate rules for the implementation of disbursing redbud school


grants pursuant to this section. The State Board of Education shall


prescribe rules for making grants of aid from, and for otherwise


administering, the fund pursuant to the provisions of this


paragraph, and may employ and fix the duties and compensation of


technicians, aides, clerks, stenographers, attorneys, and other

Req. No. 1370 Page 13


personnel deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this


paragraph. The cost of administering the fund shall be paid from


monies appropriated to the State Board of Education for the


operation of the State Department of Education. From monies


apportioned to the fund, the State Department of Education may


reserve not more than one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) for


purposes of administering the fund;


22. Recognize that the Director of the Department of


Corrections shall be the administrative authority for the schools


which are maintained in the state reformatories and shall appoint


the principals and teachers in such schools. Provided, that rules


of the State Board of Education for the classification, inspection,


and accreditation of public schools shall be applicable to such


schools; and such schools shall comply with standards set by the


State Board of Education; and


23. Have authority to administer a revolving fund which is


hereby created in the State Treasury, to be designated the


“Statistical Services Revolving Fund”. The fund shall consist of


all monies received from the various school districts of the state,


the United States Government, and other sources for the purpose of


furnishing or financing statistical services and for any other


purpose as designated by the Legislature. The State Board of


Education is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with school


districts, municipalities, the United States Government,

Req. No. 1370 Page 14


foundations, and other agencies or individuals for services,


programs, or research projects. The Statistical Services Revolving


Fund shall be administered in accordance with Section 155 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. 1. The redbud school grants shall be determined by the


State Department of Education as follows:


a. divide the county four-mill levy revenue by four to


determine the nonchargeable county four-mill revenue


for each school district,


b. determine the amount of new revenue generated by the


five-mill building fund levy as authorized by Section


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution for each


school district as reported in the Oklahoma Cost


Accounting System for the preceding fiscal year,


c. add the amounts calculated in subparagraphs a and b of


this paragraph to determine the nonchargeable millage


for each school district,


d. add the nonchargeable millage in each district


statewide as calculated in subparagraph c of this


paragraph and divide the total by the average daily


membership in public schools statewide based on the


preceding school year’s average daily membership,


according to the provisions of Section 18-107 of this


title. This amount is the statewide nonchargeable

Req. No. 1370 Page 15


millage per student, known as the baseline local


funding per student,


e. all eligible charter schools shall be included in


these calculations as unique school districts,


separate from the school district that may sponsor the


eligible charter school, and the total number of


districts shall be used to determine the statewide


average baseline local funding per student,


f. for each school district or eligible charter school


which is below the baseline local funding per student,


the Department shall subtract the baseline local


funding per student from the average nonchargeable


millage per student of the school district or eligible


charter school to determine the nonchargeable millage


per student shortfall for each district, and


g. the nonchargeable millage per student shortfall for a


school district or eligible charter school shall be


multiplied by the average daily membership of the


preceding school year of the eligible school district


or eligible charter school. This amount shall be the


redbud school grant amount for the school district or


eligible charter school.


2. For fiscal year 2022, monies for the redbud school grants


shall be expended from the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 426

Req. No. 1370 Page 16


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For fiscal year 2023 and each


subsequent fiscal year, monies for the redbud school grants shall be


appropriated pursuant to Section 426 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, not to exceed three-fourths (3/4) of the tax collected in


the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 426 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes as determined by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. For


fiscal year 2023 and each subsequent fiscal year, if such


appropriated funds are insufficient to fund the redbud school


grants, then an additional apportionment of funds shall be made from


sales tax collections as provided by subsection D of Section 1353 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. If both funds are insufficient,


the Department shall promulgate rules to permit a decrease to the


baseline local funding per student to the highest amount allowed


with the funding available.


3. As used in this section, “eligible charter school” shall


mean a charter school which is sponsored pursuant to the provisions


of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act. Provided, however, eligible


charter school shall not include a statewide virtual charter school


sponsored by the Statewide Charter School Board but shall only


include those which provide in-person or blended instruction, as


provided by Section 1-111 of this title, to not less than two-thirds


(2/3) of students as the primary means of instructional service


delivery.



Req. No. 1370 Page 17


4. The Department shall develop a program to acknowledge the


redbud school grant recipients and shall include elected members of


the House of Representatives and Senate who represent the school


districts and eligible charter schools.


5. The Department shall create a dedicated page on its website


listing annual redbud school grant recipients, amount awarded to


each recipient, and other pertinent information about the Redbud


School Funding Act.


6. The Department shall provide the chair of the House


Appropriations and Budget Committee and the chair of the Senate


Appropriations Committee no later than February 1 of each year with


an estimate of the upcoming year’s redbud school grant allocation as


prescribed by this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1370 EB 1/19/2025 5:43:31 AM









Req. No. 1370 Page 18